North Carolina, session 2025, HB480.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 1 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 90-12.2B. Licensure by endorsement.
(a) The Board may issue a license as a physician, physician assistant, or anesthesiologist
assistant in North Carolina to an applicant who submits an application for licensure by
endorsement to the Board and satisfies all of the following, as applicable to the applicant's
licensure:
(1) Has held an active, full, and unrestricted license in at least one other United
States jurisdiction, including any state, territory, or district, for at least five
years. Physicians applying for a license to practice medicine must have
practiced with an active, full, and unrestricted license for at least two years
after completing training after graduating from medical school in a residency
program approved by any of the following:
a. The Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education.
b. The American Osteopathic Association.
c. The Royal College of Physicians and Surgeons of Canada.
d. The College of Family Physicians of Canada.
(2) An employer submits a letter to the Board verifying that the applicant has
accepted an offer of full-time employment to practice consistent with the
applicant's respective licensure in person at a physical location in this State
rendering care to individuals in this State.
(3) Provides to the Board sufficient proof of identification, including the
applicant's social security number, certified or official copy of birth certificate,
copy of drivers license, United States passport, or other government-issued
identification. The applicant shall include documentation of any legal name
change.
(4) Provides an attestation that the applicant meets all of the following:
a. Is in good standing in all jurisdictions of licensure where the applicant
holds an active license, has not been disciplined in the last five years
by any occupational licensing board preceding the application by
endorsement, and has no pending investigations by any occupational
licensing board.
*H480-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. Is not the subject to any adverse action taken by any regulatory board
or agency overseeing the applicant's respective licensure in the last
five years preceding the application for licensure by endorsement.
c. Has actively practiced as a physician, physician assistant, or
anesthesiologist assistant for an average of 20 hours or more per week
during the two years immediately preceding the application for
licensure by endorsement.
d. Has no misdemeanor or felony convictions in the last five years
preceding the application for licensure by endorsement.
e. Meets the licensure requirements of physicians under G.S. 90-9.1 or
G.S. 90-9.2, physician assistants under G.S. 90-9.3, or
anesthesiologist assistants under G.S. 90-9.4.
f. Meets the examination requirements of G.S. 90-10.1 for physician
licensure.
g. Is able to satisfy all licensing requirements of any applicable Board
rule, including 21 NCAC 32B .1303, 21 NCAC 32S .0202, and 21
NCAC 32W .0102, as amended, for physicians, physician assistants,
and anesthesiologist assistants, respectively.
(b) Licensees who have received a licensure in accordance with subsection (a) of this
section shall submit to the Board any additional licensure information for a license as required
by any applicable Board rule, including 21 NCAC 32B .1303, as amended, within 120 days of
receipt of licensure by endorsement under this section. Failure to provide the necessary
information under this section shall constitute a basis for the Board to investigate that failure and
take appropriate action. The Board has the authority to investigate and take appropriate action
against an applicant or licensee who applied for or received licensure by endorsement under this
section. The Board shall retain jurisdiction over the holder of any inactive license issued by the
Board.
(c) A license issued under this section shall become inactive after 180 days unless the
applicant meets all of the requirements of subsection (b) of this section.
(d) An applicant for licensure by endorsement shall pay the applicable license fees under
G.S. 90-13.1 and applicable criminal background check fees under G.S. 90-11."
SECTION 2. G.S. 90-13.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-13.1. License fees.
(a) Each applicant for a license to practice medicine and surgery in this State under
G.S. 90-9.1, 90-9.2, or 90-12.02 shall pay to the North Carolina Medical Board an application
fee of four hundred dollars ($400.00).not to exceed five hundred fifty dollars ($550.00).
(a1) Physicians applying for licensure by endorsement under G.S. 90-12.2B shall pay to
the Board an application fee not to exceed eight hundred twenty-five dollars ($825.00).
(b) Each applicant for a limited license to practice in a medical education and training
program under G.S. 90-12.01 shall pay to the Board a fee of one hundred dollars ($100.00).one
hundred twenty-five dollars ($125.00).
(c) An applicant for a limited volunteer license under G.S. 90-12.1A or G.S. 90-12.1B
shall not pay a fee.
(d) A fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) shall be paid for the issuance of a duplicate
license.
(e) All fees shall be paid in advance to the North Carolina Medical Board, to be held in
a fund for the use of the Board.
(f) For the initial and annual licensure of an anesthesiologist assistant, the Board may
require the payment of a fee not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00).two hundred
dollars ($200.00).
Page 2 House Bill 480-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(g) Anesthesiologist assistants applying for licensure by endorsement under
G.S. 90-12.2B shall pay to the Board an application fee not to exceed three hundred dollars
($300.00).
(h) For the initial licensure of a physician assistant, the Board shall require the payment
of a fee not to exceed three hundred twenty-five dollars ($325.00).
(i) Physician assistants applying for licensure by endorsement under G.S. 90-12.2B shall
pay to the Board an application fee not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00)."
SECTION 3. G.S. 90-13.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-13.2. Registration every year with Board.
(a) Every licensee shall register annually with the Board no later than 30 days after the
person's birthday.
(b) A person who registers with the Board shall report to the Board the person's name and
office and residence address and any other information required by the Board, and shall pay an
annual registration fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00), not to exceed three hundred fifty
dollars ($350.00), except those who have a limited license to practice in a medical education and
training program approved by the Board for the purpose of education or training shall pay a
registration fee of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125.00), one hundred fifty dollars
($150.00), and those who have a retired limited volunteer license pursuant to G.S. 90-12.1B or a
limited volunteer license pursuant to G.S. 90-12.1A shall pay no annual registration fee.
However, licensees who have a limited license to practice for the purpose of education and
training under G.S. 90-12.01 shall not be required to pay more than one annual registration fee
for each year of training.
(b1) Physician assistants shall pay an annual registration fee not to exceed two hundred
dollars ($200.00). A physician assistant who fails to register as required by this section shall pay
an additional fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) to the Board.
(c) Repealed by Session Laws 2016-117, s. 2(i), effective October 1, 2016.
(d) A licensee who is not actively engaged in the performance of medical acts, tasks, or
functions in North Carolina and who does not wish to register the license may direct the Board
to place the license on inactive status.
(e) A physician who fails to register as required by this section shall pay an additional
fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) to the Board. The license of any physician who fails to register and
who remains unregistered for a period of 30 days after certified notice of the failure is
automatically inactive. The Board shall retain jurisdiction over the holder of the inactive license.
(f) Except as provided in G.S. 90-12.1B, a person whose license is inactive shall not
practice medicine in North Carolina nor be required to pay the annual registration fee.
(g) Upon payment of all accumulated fees and penalties, the license of the licensee may
be reinstated, subject to the Board requiring the licensee to appear before the Board for an
interview and to comply with other licensing requirements. The penalty may not exceed the
applicable maximum fee for a license under G.S. 90-13.1.
(h) The Board shall not deny a licensee's annual registration based solely on the licensee's
failure to become board certified."
SECTION 4. G.S. 90-689 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-689. Expenses; fees.
(a) All fees shall be payable to the Medical Board and deposited in the name of the
Medical Board in financial institutions designated by the Medical Board as official depositories.
These fees shall be used to carry out the purposes of this Article.
(b) All salaries, compensation, and expenses incurred or allowed to carry out the purposes
of this Article shall be paid by the Medical Board exclusively out of the fees received by the
Medical Board as authorized by this Article or funds received from other sources. In no case shall
any salary, expense, or other obligation authorized by this Article be charged against the State
treasury.
House Bill 480-Second Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) The Committee, upon the approval of the Medical Board, shall establish fees not
exceeding the following amounts:
(1) License application $350.00$400.00
(2) Biennial renewal of license $350.00$400.00
(3) Late renewal of license $100.00
(4) Provisional license $175.00$200.00
(5) Copies of rules Cost."
SECTION 5. The North Carolina Medical Board may adopt temporary rules to
implement the provisions of this act.
SECTION 6. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025.
Page 4 House Bill 480-Second Edition